Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5453XD (2) 91 nls/ko S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 502.511, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. The commissioner of insurance , or the investment 3 adviser that reported the information in the record in the 4 investment adviser registration depository, may shall be named 5 as a respondent or as respondents in the proceeding to expunge 6 the information. 7 b. An investment adviser that reported the information in 8 the record in the investment adviser registration depository 9 may be named as a respondent in the proceeding to expunge the 10 information. 11